Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB671.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 67.410 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The fiscal court of any county may appoint a qualified and competent person to
administer such regulations. His or her official title shall be "Building Inspector of
.... County, Kentucky." His or her salary shall be fixed by the fiscal court, and paid
out of the county levy. He or she shall have such deputies and assistants as the
fiscal court deems necessary, and their salaries shall likewise be fixed by the fiscal
court and paid out of the county levy. The fiscal court shall also pay out of county
funds the necessary expenses of his or her office. The fiscal court may contract
with individuals or corporations for the performance of technical or scientific
services required for the proper enforcement and administration of its building
regulations.
(2) No person shall build, erect, construct, reconstruct, remodel, relocate, alter, or
repair any building within the county without first obtaining a building permit from
the building inspector.
(3) The fiscal court shall establish a system of reasonable fees to be charged every
applicant for such permit, but such fees shall not exceed the cost of the service
provided.
(4) Any person aggrieved by any ruling, order, or decision of such building inspector
may appeal using the procedures provided in KRS 198B.070.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/10/2025 3:00 PM Jacketed